Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.110

Powers and duties of office of financial management.

The office of financial management shall:

(1) Provide technical assistance to the governor and the legislature in identifying needs and in planning to meet those needs through state programs and a plan for expenditures.

(2) Perform the comprehensive planning functions and processes necessary or advisable for state program planning and development, preparation of the budget, inter-departmental and inter-governmental coordination and cooperation, and determination of state capital improvement requirements.

(3) Provide assistance and coordination to state agencies and departments in their preparation of plans and programs.

(4) Provide general coordination and review of plans in functional areas of state government as may be necessary for receipt of federal or state funds.

(5) Participate with other states or subdivisions thereof in interstate planning.

(6) Encourage educational and research programs that further planning and provide administrative and technical services therefor.

(7) Carry out the provisions of RCW 43.62.010 through 43.62.050 relating to the state census.

(8) Be the official state participant in the federal-state cooperative program for local population estimates and as such certify all city and county special censuses to be considered in the allocation of state and federal revenues.

(9) Be the official state center for processing and dissemination of federal decennial or quinquennial census data in cooperation with other state agencies.

(10) Be the official state agency certifying annexations, incorporations, or disincorporations to the United States bureau of the census.

(11) Review all United States bureau of the census population estimates used for federal revenue sharing purposes and provide a liaison for local governments with the United States bureau of the census in adjusting or correcting revenue sharing population estimates.

(12) Provide fiscal notes depicting the expected fiscal impact of proposed legislation in accordance with chapter 43.88A RCW.

(13) Be the official state agency to estimate and manage the cash flow of all public funds as provided in chapter 43.88 RCW. To this end, the office shall adopt such rules as are necessary to manage the cash flow of public funds.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 510; 2002 c 332 s 23; 1981 2nd ex.s. c 4 s 13; 1979 c 10 s 3. Prior: 1977 ex.s. c 110 s 4; 1977 ex.s. c 25 s 6; 1969 ex.s. c 239 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Intent—Effective date—2002 c 332: See notes following RCW 43.19.760.

Severability—1981 2nd ex.s. c 4: See note following RCW 43.30.325.